Vermont, session 2025-2026, H8.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5830g is added to read:
§ 5830g. HOME MODIFICATION TAX CREDIT
(a) An individual shall be eligible for a credit against the tax imposed under
section 5822 of this title. The credit shall be equal to an individual’s qualified
expenses for home modifications to enhance safety and livability. An
individual shall not claim more than $15,000.00 of qualified expenses under
this section in a lifetime.
VT LEG #379044 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.8
2025 Page 2 of 3
(b) As used in this section, “qualified expenses” means unreimbursed and
uncovered expenses relating to the following modifications of a homestead to
enhance safety and livability:
(1) ramps;
(2) stair lifts, chair lifts, platform lifts, and elevators;
(3) widened doorways and hallways;
(4) bathroom renovation; and
(5) any other modification specifically made to improve accessibility or
safety.
(c) As used in this section, “homestead” has the same meaning as in
subdivision 5401(7) of this title.
(d) If the amount of allowed tax credit exceeds the individual’s income tax
liability for the taxable year, the excess amount may be carried over for
deduction from the taxpayer’s income tax liability in the next succeeding
taxable year or years until the total amount of the tax credit has been deducted
from tax liability; provided, however, that no tax credit shall be carried over
for deduction after the third taxable year succeeding the taxable year in which
the credit was earned.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 5813 is amended to read:
* * *
VT LEG #379044 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.8
2025 Page 3 of 3
(aa) The statutory purpose of the tax credit for home modifications in
section 5830g of this title is to help individuals live more safely in their homes.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this act shall take effect retroactively on
January 1, 2025 and apply to taxable years on and after January 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379044 v.1